New York, session 2025-2026, A11153.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the village of Freeport is hereby authorized to accept 3 from the Freeport Bible Center an application for exemption from real 4 property taxes pursuant to section 430 of the real property tax law with 5 respect to the 2026 assessment roll, for all applicable taxes for the 6 parcels owned by such not-for-profit corporation located at 50 North 7 Main Street, village of Freeport, county of Nassau, otherwise known as 8 Nassau county tax map district section 55 block 236-1 lot 202, Nassau 9 county tax map district section 55 block 236-01 lot 203, Nassau county 10 tax map district section 55 block 236-1 lot 66, and Nassau county tax 11 map district section 62 block 092-00 lot 00011. If accepted, the appli- 12 cation shall be reviewed as if it had been received on or before the 13 taxable status date established for such assessment rolls. 14 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 15 such exemption if such organization had filed an application for 16 exemption by the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon 17 approval by the village of Freeport board of trustees, may make appro- 18 priate correction to the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and 19 such organization, therefore, shall have paid any tax with respect to 20 the subject rolls, the applicable governing body or tax department may, 21 in its sole discretion, provide for the refund of those taxes paid and 22 cancel those taxes, fines, penalties, liens or interest remaining 23 unpaid. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15709-04-6